Hawaii statutes.
[§460J-23] Pest control. A pest
control operator may secure pest control work, identify infestations or
infections, make inspections, and submit bids or otherwise contract for pest
control work. A pest control operator may hire or employ individuals who are
not licensed under this chapter to perform work on contracts. [L 1972, c 134,
pt of §1]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next